Utah statutes.
62A-1-106.   Adjudicative proceedings.

The department and its boards, divisions, and offices described in Section 62A-1-105 shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in their adjudicative proceedings.

